02_Morphology/grn.twol
Alphabet

A B Ã C D E Ẽ G G̃ H I Ĩ J K L M N Ñ O Õ P R S T U Ũ V W X Y Z Ỹ Á É Í Ó Ú Ý   F Q
a b ã c d e ẽ g g̃ h i ĩ j k l m n ñ o õ p r s t u ũ v w x y z ỹ á é í ó ú ý ʼ f q
%>
%{m%}:p
%{m%}:m
%{g%}:g
%{g%}:k
%{n%}:0
%{n%}:n
;

Sets

VowsTon = Á É Í Ó Ú Ý
	á é í ó ú ý ;

VowsAton = A E I O U Y
	a e i o u y ;

Nas = m n ñ ã ẽ ĩ õ ỹ ũ
	M N Ñ Ã Ẽ Ĩ Õ Ỹ Ũ ;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Surface [m] in loc affix after nasals"
%{m%}:m <=> Nas: %>: _ ;

"Change vowel to tonal before the atonal suffix"
Va:Vt <=> _ %>: [ %{m%}: e: | i: c: h: a: ] ;
	where Va in ( a e o u y )
		Vt in ( á é ó ú ý )	matched;

"Delete ending -[i] before comparative -icha"
Vx:0 <=> _ %>: i: c: h: a: ;
	where Vx in ( ĩ i í) ;

"Change i to tonal before atonal suffixes"
i:í<=>_  %>: %{m%}: e: ;

"Surface [n] in plural nouns"
%{n%}:n <=> Nas: %>: _ ;

"Surface [g] in pl nouns after nasals"
%{g%}:g <=> %{n%}:n _ ;

"Change tonal vowel to atonal if tonal in affix"
Vt:Va <=> _ [ ? - VowsTon]+ VowsTon: ;
	where Vt in ( á é ó ú ý ) 
		Va in ( a e o u y )
	matched;
